Hawaii statutes.
[§429-10] Appointment of agent to receive
service of process. (a) A nonprofit association may file in the office of
the registrar of the land court or in the bureau of conveyances a statement
appointing an agent authorized to receive service of process.

(b) A statement appointing an agent shall set
forth:

(1) The name of the nonprofit association;

(2) The federal tax identification number, if any, of
the nonprofit association;

(3) The address in this State, including the street
address, if any, of the nonprofit association or, if the nonprofit association
does not have an address in this State, its address out-of-state; and

(4) The name of the person in this State authorized
to receive service of process and the person's address, including the street
address, in this State.

(c) A statement appointing an agent shall be
signed and acknowledged by a person authorized to manage the affairs of a
nonprofit association. The statement shall also be signed and acknowledged by
the person to be appointed agent, who thereby accepts the appointment. The
appointed agent may resign by filing a resignation in the office of the
registrar of the land court or in the bureau of conveyances and giving notice
to the nonprofit association.

(d) A filing officer may collect a fee for
filing a statement appointing an agent to receive service of process, an
amendment, a cancellation, or a resignation in the amount charged for filing
similar documents.

(e) An amendment to or cancellation of a
statement appointing an agent to receive service of process shall meet the
requirements for execution of an original statement. [L 1999, c 161, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next